Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF263.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Laws 2024, chapter 120, article 1, section 2, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Employment and Training Programs $ -0- $ 12,207,000 Appropriations by Fund 2024 2025 General -0- 50,000 Workforce Development -0- 12,157,000 (a) $400,000 the second year is from the workforce development fund for a grant to Sabathani Community Center for specialized community outreach and engagement, a marketing and communication plan, program evaluation, personal empowerment training for men, empowerment and truancy curriculum for youth, wellness training for seniors, a workforce strategies mentorship and jobs training program, a 15-passenger van, and service kiosks for the Sabathani Community Center, including a onetime paid internship to support these programs. This is a onetime appropriation. (b) $700,000 the second year is from the workforce development fund for a grant to the Shakopee Chamber Foundation for the Shakopee area workforce development scholarship pilot program. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2027. The commissioner of employment and economic development may enter into an interagency agreement with the Office of Higher Education, including agreements to transfer funds and to administer the program. (c) $100,000 the second year is from the workforce development fund for a grant to Inspire Change Clinic for their health care fellowship program designed to create pathways to medicine for high school and college students interested in pursuing a career in the health care workforce. The health care fellowship program is intended to remove barriers for minority students, foster inclusivity and diversity in the health care sector, and provide valuable opportunities for students, including mentorship programs, access to renowned health institutions in the state of Minnesota, and hands-on work experience. In addition to the reporting requirements in section 14, the commissioner must include the number of participants served by the grant and provide information about program outcomes. This is a onetime appropriation. (d) $250,000 the second year is from the workforce development fund for a grant to Bolder Options Youth Mentoring Program to provide disadvantaged youth ages 12 to 22 with intensive one-to-one wellness, goal-setting, and academic-focused mentorship; programming that teaches life and job-seeking skills; career and college achievement coaches; and connections to employment, job training, and education opportunities. The grant must serve youth in the Bolder Options program in the Twin Cities and the city of Rochester. In addition to the reporting requirements in section 14, the commissioner must include the number of participants served by the grant. This is a onetime appropriation. (e) $1,000,000 the second year is from the workforce development fund for a grant to Change Starts With Community for a violence prevention program. Grant money must be used to establish a comprehensive workforce development initiative, specifically tailored for at-risk youth and adults, located on site at Shiloh Cares Food Shelf in the city of Minneapolis. This is a onetime appropriation. (f) $100,000 the second year is from the workforce development fund for a grant to InspireMSP to develop programming to assist middle school-aged children in Minneapolis and St. Paul to develop an interest in and connect with the creative industry in Minnesota. Money must be used for program development and career exploration in the creative industry for historically excluded youth by providing access to essential resources, networks, and hands-on experience. This is a onetime appropriation. (g) $100,000 the second year is from the workforce development fund for a grant to Lake County Ambulance Service to establish a training program for Cook County and Lake County high school students interested in pursuing careers as emergency medical technicians. This is a onetime appropriation. (h) $350,000 the second year is from the workforce development fund for a grant to the city of Austin to develop and implement training programs for water operators and wastewater operators. Riverland Community College must offer the training programs. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2027. Of this amount, the city of Austin may use up to five percent for administration of the program. The commissioner must provide an annual report by January 5 of each year until January 5, 2028, regarding the use of grant funds under this paragraph to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over economic development and higher education. The report must include the number of students enrolled and number of students who have completed courses funded by this appropriation. (i) $250,000 the second year is from the workforce development fund for a grant to the Greater Minneapolis Council of Churches for a STEM training and career preparation program targeted at the needs of BIPOC youth. The program shall serve youth who are at least 11 years of age and less than 24 years of age and shall provide career training, job skills development, mentorship, and employment opportunities. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2027. (j) $200,000 the second year is from the workforce development fund and is for a grant to the Jobs Foundation for direct training, support services, safety enhancements, and economic support for formerly incarcerated individuals participating in the Repowered work readiness program. This is a onetime appropriation. (k) $100,000 the second year is from the workforce development fund for a grant to the North Minneapolis Pet Resource Center, also known as Mypitbullisfamilycom.Inc, Community Animal Medicine Professionals (CAMP) program to provide training, professional development workshops, mentorship and leadership programs, and develop recruitment and retention strategies. This is a onetime appropriation. (l) $1,000,000 the second year is from the workforce development fund and is for a grant to African Immigrants Community Services for workforce development for new Americans. This is a onetime appropriation. (m) $1,000,000 the second year is from the workforce development fund and is for a grant to WomenVenture for supporting child care providers by providing business training, mentorship, services, and educational materials, by facilitating shared administrative staff and pooled management of services such as banking and payroll, by providing child care management software and software training, and by distributing subgrants and loans, which may be forgivable at WomenVenture's discretion. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2027. (n) $1,000,000 the second year is from the workforce development fund and is for a grant to the Black Chamber of Commerce for technical support to Black-owned small businesses, for implementing initiatives to address barriers facing the Black business community, and for networking, mentorship, and training programs. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2027. (o) $250,000 the second year is from the workforce development fund and is for a grant to the Karen Organization of Minnesota for job training and financial support and incentives for job training participants. This is a onetime appropriation. (p) $100,000 the second year is from the workforce development fund and is for a grant to Indigenous Roots for soft skills training and career readiness training for youth. This is a onetime appropriation. (q) $100,000 the second year is from the workforce development fund and is for a grant to Ramsey County for a subgrant with People in Action to provide workforce development programming. This amount is available until June 30, 2026, and 40 percent of the amount must be expended within the city of St. Paul. Grants provided by People in Action must be awarded through at least two requests for proposals. This is a onetime appropriation. (r) $500,000 the second year is from the workforce development fund and is for a grant to the Metro Youth Diversion Center to support its Youth-Care Assessment and Readiness Education program to enhance workforce development opportunities for youth with a focus on underrepresented East African students. This is a onetime appropriation. (s) $174,000 the second year is from the workforce development fund and is for a grant to Independent School District No. 709, Duluth, for a software subscription to facilitate the career planning of students. This is a onetime appropriation. (t) $171,000 the second year is from the workforce development fund and is for a grant to Independent School District No. 704, Proctor, to develop a regional career and technical education program to serve Independent School District No. 704, Proctor, Independent School District No. 700, Hermantown, and Independent School District No. 99, Esko. This is a onetime appropriation. (u) $1,000,000 the second year is from the workforce development fund and is for a grant to the city of Brooklyn Park for the Brooklyn Park Small Business Center and for the city to expand the workforce development programming of Brooklyn Park and Brooklyn Center through workforce development programs serving primarily underrepresented populations, including such programs as Brooklynk, Career Pathways, Youth Entrepreneurship, and Community Partnership. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2027. (v) $500,000 the second year is from the workforce development fund and is for a grant to Riverside Plaza Tenant Association to address employment, economic, and technology access disparities for low-income unemployed or underemployed individuals through training in health care, technology, and construction or skilled trades industries. This is a onetime appropriation. (w) $300,000 the second year is from the workforce development fund and is for a grant to African Career, Education, and Resources, Inc., to develop a program for health care skills training and computer skills training in collaboration with the Organization of Liberians in Minnesota. This is a onetime appropriation. (x) $75,000 the second year is from the workforce development fund and is for a grant to Equitable Development Action for it to fund programs and provide technical assistance to underserved businesses. This is a onetime appropriation. (y) $50,000 the second year is from the workforce development fund and is for a grant to HIRPHA International for use on youth apprenticeships, entrepreneurship training, computer skills, and work readiness training. This is a onetime appropriation. (z) $200,000 the second year is from the workforce development fund and is for a grant to YWCA St. Paul for a strategic intervention program designed to target and connect program participants to meaningful, sustainable living wage employment. This is a onetime appropriation. (aa) $50,000 the second year is from the workforce development fund and is for a grant to United Senior Lao American Association to provide job and skills training for an underserved population. This is a onetime appropriation. (bb) $100,000 the second year is from the workforce development fund and is for a grant to Hmong American Farmers Association for workforce readiness, employment exploration, and skills development. This is a onetime appropriation. (cc) $240,000 the second year is from the workforce development fund and is for a grant to MN Zej Zog for workforce readiness, employment exploration, and skills development. This is a onetime appropriation. (dd) $100,000 the second year is from the workforce development fund and is for a grant to Ramsey County for a Justice Impact Navigator to support Ramsey County residents who have a justice impact or who are reentering the community after incarceration to connect to resources with a focus on employment and training supports. Funds must be used for a navigator pilot and other administrative expenses such as outreach, marketing, and resources for residents. This is a onetime appropriation. (ee) $100,000 the second year is from the workforce development fund and is for a grant to Ramsey County for a Digital Equity Specialist to support Ramsey County residents with digital literacy resources and skills to connect to employment and training supports. Funds must be used for a digital navigator pilot serving in Ramsey County Career Labs and community-based locations and other administrative expenses, such as outreach, marketing, and resources for residents. This is a onetime appropriation. (ff) $100,000 the second year is from the workforce development fund for a grant to Film North to attract a film festival. This is a onetime appropriation. The commissioner of employment and economic development may enter into an interagency agreement with Explore Minnesota, including agreements to transfer funds and administer the grant. (gg) $400,000 the second year is from the workforce development fund for a grant to the Twin Cities Urban League for support, capacity building, and expansion of the Work Readiness Program. This is a onetime appropriation. (hh) $500,000 the second year is from the workforce development fund for a grant to Arrowhead Opportunity Agency for the purposes of expanding workforce development opportunities deleted text begin in the regiondeleted text end new text begin through the creation of a regional hub building where services can be providednew text end . new text begin Money may be used for the costs of acquiring and refurbishing a building to serve as the hub. new text end This is a onetime appropriationnew text begin and is available until June 30, 2026new text end . (ii) $597,000 the second year is from the workforce development fund for a grant to the Minneapolis Downtown Council for infrastructure and associated costs for the Taste of Minnesota event, including but not limited to buildout, permits, garbage services, staffing, security, equipment rentals, signage, and insurance. This is a onetime appropriation. The commissioner of employment and economic development may enter into an interagency agreement with Explore Minnesota, including agreements to transfer funds and administer the grant. (jj) $50,000 the second year is from the general fund for a grant to Block Builders Foundation. This appropriation must be used for programming targeted toward at-risk youth coaching, financial literacy education, juvenile offender diversion programming, and community outreach. This is a onetime appropriation. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day after final enactment. new text end